src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_VLONG_CONJ_boodawe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  VAI - VLONG - boodawe - CONJ :

  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4
  #neg	persnum	pret	dub

     #Isolation form
     boodawe: boodawe
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     boodawe+Neg: boodawesiw
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     boodawe+1Pl: boodaweaang
     boodawe+1Sg: boodaweaanh
     boodawe+21: boodaweing
     boodawe+2Pl: boodaweeg
     boodawe+2Sg: boodawein
     boodawe+3Obv: boodawenid
     boodawe+3PlNeg: boodawegwaa
     boodawe+3PlPos: boodawewaad
     boodawe+3Sg: boodawed
     boodawe+Indef: boodaweng
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     boodawe+Pret: boodaweban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     boodawe+Dub: boodaween
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     boodawe+Neg+1Pl: boodawesiwaang
     boodawe+Neg+1Sg: boodawesiwaanh
     boodawe+Neg+21: boodawesiwing
     boodawe+Neg+2Pl: boodawesiweg
     boodawe+Neg+2Sg: boodawesiwin
     boodawe+Neg+3Obv: boodawesiwnid
     boodawe+Neg+3PlNeg: boodawesiwgwaa
     boodawe+Neg+3PlPos: boodawesiwwaad
     boodawe+Neg+3Sg: boodawesiwd
     boodawe+Neg+Indef: boodawesiwng
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     boodawe+Neg+Pret: boodawesiwban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     boodawe+Neg+Dub: boodawesiwen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     boodawe+1Pl+Pret: boodaweaangban
     boodawe+1Sg+Pret: boodaweaanhban
     boodawe+21+Pret: boodaweingban
     boodawe+2Pl+Pret: boodaweegban
     boodawe+2Sg+Pret: boodaweinban
     boodawe+3Obv+Pret: boodawenidban
     boodawe+3PlNeg+Pret: boodawegwaaban
     boodawe+3PlPos+Pret: boodawewaadban
     boodawe+3Sg+Pret: boodawedban
     boodawe+Indef+Pret: boodawengban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     boodawe+1Pl+Dub: boodaweaangen
     boodawe+1Sg+Dub: boodaweaanhen
     boodawe+21+Dub: boodaweingen
     boodawe+2Pl+Dub: boodaweegen
     boodawe+2Sg+Dub: boodaweinen
     boodawe+3Obv+Dub: boodaweniden
     boodawe+3PlNeg+Dub: boodawegwaaen
     boodawe+3PlPos+Dub: boodawewaaden
     boodawe+3Sg+Dub: boodaweden
     boodawe+Indef+Dub: boodawengen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     boodawe+Pret+Dub: boodawebanen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     boodawe+Neg+1Pl+Pret: boodawesiwaangban
     boodawe+Neg+1Sg+Pret: boodawesiwaanhban
     boodawe+Neg+21+Pret: boodawesiwingban
     boodawe+Neg+2Pl+Pret: boodawesiwegban
     boodawe+Neg+2Sg+Pret: boodawesiwinban
     boodawe+Neg+3Obv+Pret: boodawesiwnidban
     boodawe+Neg+3PlNeg+Pret: boodawesiwgwaaban
     boodawe+Neg+3PlPos+Pret: boodawesiwwaadban
     boodawe+Neg+3Sg+Pret: boodawesiwdban
     boodawe+Neg+Indef+Pret: boodawesiwngban
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     boodawe+Neg+1Pl+Dub: boodawesiwaangen
     boodawe+Neg+1Sg+Dub: boodawesiwaanhen
     boodawe+Neg+21+Dub: boodawesiwingen
     boodawe+Neg+2Pl+Dub: boodawesiwegen
     boodawe+Neg+2Sg+Dub: boodawesiwinen
     boodawe+Neg+3Obv+Dub: boodawesiwniden
     boodawe+Neg+3PlNeg+Dub: boodawesiwgwaaen
     boodawe+Neg+3PlPos+Dub: boodawesiwwaaden
     boodawe+Neg+3Sg+Dub: boodawesiwden
     boodawe+Neg+Indef+Dub: boodawesiwngen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     boodawe+Neg+Pret+Dub: boodawesiwbanen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     boodawe+1Pl+Pret+Dub: boodaweaangbanen
     boodawe+1Sg+Pret+Dub: boodaweaanhbanen
     boodawe+21+Pret+Dub: boodaweingbanen
     boodawe+2Pl+Pret+Dub: boodaweegbanen
     boodawe+2Sg+Pret+Dub: boodaweinbanen
     boodawe+3Obv+Pret+Dub: boodawenidbanen
     boodawe+3PlNeg+Pret+Dub: boodawegwaabanen
     boodawe+3PlPos+Pret+Dub: boodawewaadbanen
     boodawe+3Sg+Pret+Dub: boodawedbanen
     boodawe+Indef+Pret+Dub: boodawengbanen
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     boodawe+Neg+1Pl+Pret+Dub: boodawesiwaangbanen
     boodawe+Neg+1Sg+Pret+Dub: boodawesiwaanhbanen
     boodawe+Neg+21+Pret+Dub: boodawesiwingbanen
     boodawe+Neg+2Pl+Pret+Dub: boodawesiwegbanen
     boodawe+Neg+2Sg+Pret+Dub: boodawesiwinbanen
     boodawe+Neg+3Obv+Pret+Dub: boodawesiwnidbanen
     boodawe+Neg+3PlNeg+Pret+Dub: boodawesiwgwaabanen
     boodawe+Neg+3PlPos+Pret+Dub: boodawesiwwaadbanen
     boodawe+Neg+3Sg+Pret+Dub: boodawesiwdbanen
     boodawe+Neg+Indef+Pret+Dub: boodawesiwngbanen
     
